Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-203 Actions or proceedings.
(a) An action or special proceeding may be maintained, by the president or
treasurer of the society, to recover any property, or upon any cause of action,
for or upon which all the associates may maintain an action or special
proceeding, by reason of their interest or ownership therein, either jointly or
in common. An action may likewise be maintained by the president or treasurer
to recover from one or more members of the society such member's or members'
proportionate share of any moneys lawfully expended by the society for the
benefit of the associates, or to enforce any lawful claim of the society
against its member or members.

(b) An action or special proceeding may be
maintained, against the president or treasurer of the society, to recover any
property, or upon any cause of action, for or upon which the plaintiff may
maintain an action or special proceeding, against all the associates, by reason
of their interest or ownership, or claim of ownership therein, either jointly
or in common, or their liability therefor, either jointly or severally, and any
order, decree, judgment, or other ruling in any such case shall be binding upon
the society and the members thereof.

(c) The death or legal incapacity of a member
of the society shall not affect an action or special proceeding, brought as
prescribed in subsections (a) and (b). If the officer, by or against whom it
is brought, dies, is removed, resigns, or becomes otherwise incapacitated,
during the pendency thereof, the court shall make an order, directing it to be
continued by or against such officer's successor in office, or any other
officer, by or against whom it might have been originally commenced.

(d) In such an action, the officer against
whom it is brought cannot be arrested; and a judgment against such officer
shall not authorize an execution to be issued against the officer's property,
or the officer's person; nor shall the docketing thereof bind the officer's
real property or personal property. Where the judgment is for a sum of money,
an execution issued thereupon shall require the levying officer to satisfy the
judgment out of any personal or real property belonging to the society, or
owned, jointly or in common, by all the members thereof.

(e) Where an action has been brought against
an officer, or a counterclaim has been made, in an action brought by an
officer, as prescribed in this section, another action, for the same cause,
shall not be brought against the members of the society, or any of them, until
after final judgment in the first action, and the return, wholly or partly
unsatisfied or unexecuted, of an execution issued thereupon. After the return,
the party in whose favor the execution was issued, may maintain an action, as
follows:

(1) Where such party was the plaintiff, or a
defendant recovering upon a counterclaim, such party may maintain an action
against the members of the society, or, in a proper case, against any of them,
as if the first action had not been brought, or the counterclaim had not been
made, as the case requires; and such party may recover, as part of such party's
damages, the costs of the first action, or so much thereof, as the sum,
collected by virtue of the execution, was insufficient to satisfy; and

(2) Where such party was a defendant, and the case is
not within paragraph (1), such party may maintain an action, to recover the sum
remaining uncollected, against the persons who composed the society, when the
action against such party was commenced, or the survivors of them.

(f) This section shall not affect the right of
the person, in whose favor the judgment in the first action was rendered, to
enforce a bond or undertaking, given in the course of the proceedings therein.

(g) This section shall not prevent an action
from being brought by or against all the members of a society, except as
prescribed in this section. Where an action is brought against the members of
the society, as prescribed in this section, the time between the commencement
of the action by or against the officer, and the return of the first execution
issued upon the final judgment rendered therein, shall not be a part of the
time limited by law, for the commencement of the second action. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2; am L 2004, c 122, §85]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next